en: Banana jams
bg: Конфитюр от банани
de: Banana Konfitüren
es: Mermeladas y confituras de plátano, Mermeladas de plátano, Confituras de plátano, Mermeladas y confituras de banana, Mermeladas de banana, Confituras de banana
fr: Confitures de bananes
hr: Džemovi od banana
hu: Banán lekvár
it: Confetture di banane, Marmellate di banane
ja: バナナジャム
nl: Bananenjams
pt: Doces de banana

en: Guava jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de guayaba, Mermeladas de guayaba, Confituras de guayaba
fr: Confitures de goyaves
hr: Džemovi od guave
hu: Guava dzsem, Guava lekvár
it: Confetture di guaiava, Marmellate di guaiava
nl: Guavejams
pt: Doces de goiaba

en: Lychee jams, Litchi jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de lichis, Mermeladas de lichis, Confituras de lichis
fr: Confitures de litchis
hr: Džemovi od ličija
it: Confetture di litchi, Marmellate di litchi
ja: ライチジャム
nl: Litchijams

en: Papaya jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de papaya, Mermeladas de papaya, Confituras de papaya
fr: Confitures de papayes
hr: Džemovi od papaje
it: Confetture di papaia, Marmellate di papaia
ja: パパイヤジャム
nl: Papayajams
pt: Doces de papaia

en: Pineapple jams, Pineapple Marmalades
bg: Конфитюр от ананас
de: Ananas Konfitüren, Ananas Marmelade
es: Mermeladas y confituras de piña, Mermeladas de piña, Confituras de piña
fi: ananashillot
fr: Confitures d'ananas, Marmelades d’ananas
hr: Džemovi od ananasa
hu: Ananász lekvár, Ananász dzsem, Ananász marmelád
it: Confetture di ananas, Marmellate di ananas
ja: パインアップルジャム, パイナップルジャム
nl: Ananasjams, Ananasmarmelades
pt: Doces de ananás

en: Mango jams
bg: Конфитюр от манго
de: Mangomarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de mango, Mermeladas de mango, Confituras de mango
fr: Confitures de mangues
hr: Džemovi od manga
hu: Mangó dzsem, Mangó lekvár
it: Confetture di mango, Marmellate di mango
ja: マンゴージャム
nl: Mangojams
pt: Doces de manga

en: Watermelon jams
fr: Confitures de pastèque
hr: Džemovi od lubenica
it: Confetture di angurie, Marmellate di angurie
ja: スイカジャム

en: wine jams
nl: Wijnjams

it: Mostarda bolognese
fr: Moutarde bolognaise

it: Mostarda di Cremona
fr: Moutarde de Crémone

it: Mostarda mantovana
fr: Moutarde de Mantoue

it: Mostarda venata
fr: Mostarda vénitienne, moutarde vénitienne

en: Citrus jams
da: Marmelader af citrusfrugter
de: Zitronenmarmeladen
el: μαρμελάδα εσπεριδοειδών
es: Mermeladas y confituras de cítricos
et: Tsitrusmarmelaad
fi: sitrushillot
fr: Confitures d’agrumes, Confiture d’agrumes
hr: Džemovi od citrusa
hu: Citrus lekvárok
it: Confetture di agrumi
nl: Citrusmarmelades
pt: Citrinada

en: Marmalades, Marmelades
bg: Мармалад
cs: Marmeládou
de: Marmeladen, Marmelade
es: Mermeladas, Marmalade
fi: Marmeladit, Marmeladi
fr: Marmelades
hr: Marmelada
hu: Marmelád
it: Marmellate, marmellata
ja: マーマレード
lt: Marmeladas
lv: Marmelāde
mt: marmellata
nl: Marmelades, Marmelade
pl: Marmolada
pt: Marmeladas
ro: Marmelada
sk: Marmeláda
sl: Marmelada
sv: Marmelad

en: Bigarade orange marmelades
fr: Confitures d'oranges amères, confitures d'orange amère, confitures de bigarades, Marmelades d'oranges amères, Marmelades de bigaradiers
hr: Bigarade marmelade od naranče
it: Marmellate di arancia amara, Salsa bigarade, Confetture di arancia amara
nl: Bittere sinaasappelmarmelade

en: Clementine jams
bg: Конфитюр от клементини
de: Mandarinen Marmelade, Klementinen Marmelade
es: Mermeladas y confituras de clementinas, Mermeladas de clementinas, Confituras de clementinas
fr: Confitures de clémentine
hr: Džemovi od klementina
hu: Clementine lekvár
it: Marmellate di clementine, Confetture di clementine
nl: Clementinemarmelades

en: Lemon jams, Lemon marmelades
de: Zitronen-Konfitüren
es: Mermeladas y confituras de limón, Mermeladas de limón, Confituras de limón
fr: Confitures de citron, Marmelades de citrons
hr: Džemovi od limuna
hu: Citrom lekvár, Citrom marmelád
it: Marmellate di limoni, Confetture di limoni
ja: レモンジャム, レモンマーマレード
nl: Citroenjams, Citroenmarmelades
pt: Doces de limão

en: Mandarin jams
fr: Confitures de mandarines, confitures de mandarine
hr: Džemovi od mandarina
it: Marmellate di mandarini, Confetture di mandarini

en: Orange jams, Orange Marmalades
bg: Конфитюр от портокали
de: Orangen-Konfitüren, Orangenmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de naranja, Mermeladas y confituras de naranja amarga, Confituras de naranja, Confituras de naranja amarga, Mermeladas de naranja
fi: appelsiinihillot, Appelsiinimarmeladit
fr: Confitures d’orange, Marmelades d’oranges, Marmelade d’oranges
hr: Džemovi od naranče
hu: Narancs lekvár, Narancs marmelád
it: Marmellate di arance, Confetture di arance, Confetture di arance dolci
ja: オレンジジャム, オレンジマーマレード
nl: Sinaasappeljams, Sinaasappelmarmelades

en: Tangerine jams
it: Marmellate di mandarini tangerini, Confetture di mandarini tangerini